src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
! --------------------
!! The LATVIAN language adjectives compare.


LEXICON A_13JAUNS_
+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef@U.SUPERL.OFF@:0000%>s@U.SUPERL.OFF@     K   ;
+A+Pos+Der/Adv+Adv@U.SUPERL.OFF@:%>i00@U.SUPERL.OFF@ K ;
+A+Pos@U.SUPERL.OFF@:00@U.SUPERL.OFF@ NMN_13_ ;
+A+Der/āk+Comp+Der/Adv+Adv@U.SUPERL.OFF@:%>āk00@U.SUPERL.OFF@ K ;
+A+Der/āk+Comp@U.SUPERL.OFF@:%>āk@U.SUPERL.OFF@ NMN_13_ ;
+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef@U.SUPERL.OFF@:%>āk%>s00@U.SUPERL.OFF@ K ;
+A+Der/āk+Superl@U.SUPERL.ON@:āk0@U.SUPERL.ON@ NMN_13_ ;

LEXICON A_14ZAĻŠ_  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ zaļš:zaļ
+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef@U.SUPERL.OFF@:0000%>š@U.SUPERL.OFF@     K   ;
+A+Pos+Der/Adv+Adv@U.SUPERL.OFF@:%>i00@U.SUPERL.OFF@ K ;
+A+Pos@U.SUPERL.OFF@:00@U.SUPERL.OFF@ NMN_13_ ;
+A+Der/āk+Comp+Der/Adv+Adv@U.SUPERL.OFF@:%>āk00@U.SUPERL.OFF@ K ;
+A+Der/āk+Comp@U.SUPERL.OFF@:%>āk@U.SUPERL.OFF@ NMN_13_ ;
+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef@U.SUPERL.OFF@:%>āk%>s00@U.SUPERL.OFF@ K ;
+A+Der/āk+Superl@U.SUPERL.ON@:%>āk@U.SUPERL.ON@ NMN_13-DEF_ ;

LEXICON NMN_13_
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>i     K   ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>a     K   ;
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>u     K   ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>am     K   ;
+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>iem     K   ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>u    K   ;
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>us   K   ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef:%>ā    K   ;
+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef:%>os   K   ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>a     K   ;
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>as     K   ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>as     K   ;
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>u     K   ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ai     K   ;
+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>ām     K   ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>u    K   ;
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>as   K   ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef:%>ā    K   ;
+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef:%>ās   K   ;
NMN_13-DEF_ ;

LEXICON NMN_13-DEF_
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>ais     K   ;
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:%>ie     K   ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ā     K   ;
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:%>o     K   ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ajam     K   ;
+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:%>ajiem     K   ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>o    K   ;
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:%>os   K   ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def:%>ajā    K   ;
+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def:%>ajos   K   ;
+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>ais    K   ;
+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def:%>ie   K   ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>ā     K   ;
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>ās     K   ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ās     K   ;
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>o     K   ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ajai     K   ;
+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>ajām     K   ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>o    K   ;
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>ās   K   ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def:%>ajā    K   ;
+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def:%>ajās   K   ;
+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def:%>ā    K   ;
+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def:%>ās   K   ;


! vim+Def: set ft=xfst-lexc:
