src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON adjectives
agrārs+A:agrār A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
alkatīgs+A:alkatīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
antiamerikānisks+A:antiamerikānisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
apaļš+A:apaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
aplams+A:aplam A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
asinssarkans+A:asinssarkan A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
attaisnojošs+A:attaisnojoš A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
aušīgs+A:aušīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
bangaiņš+A:bangaiņ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
bezalkoholisks+A:bezalkoholisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
bezķermenisks+A:bezķermenisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
boreāls+A:boreāl A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
briljantzaļš+A:briljantzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
bromkrezolzaļš+A:bromkrezolzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
bļodveidīgs+A:bļodveidīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
cimdots+A:cimdot A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
daiļš+A:daiļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
daudzdimensionāls+A:daudzdimensionāl A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
dekoltēts+A:dekoltēt A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
diastolisks+A:diastolisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
disulfotons+A:disulfoton A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
dobjš+A:dobj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
dompilns+A:dompiln A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
dumjš+A:dumj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
dumš+A:dum A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
dzegužveidīgs+A:dzegužveidīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
dziļdziļš+A:dziļdziļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
dziļš+A:dziļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
dīgtspējīgs+A:dīgtspējīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
eksponenciāls+A:eksponenciāl A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
endokrīns+A:endokrīn A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
familiārs+A:familiār A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
formālistisks+A:formālistisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
gaišzaļš+A:gaišzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
galēnisks+A:galēnisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
garš+A:gar A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
glupjš+A:glupj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
glāsains+A:glāsain A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
grupveidīgs+A:grupveidīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
grīļš+A:grīļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
heparinizēts+A:heparinizēt A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
hologrāfisks+A:hologrāfisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
ieapaļš+A:ieapaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
iegribīgs+A:iegribīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
ieskāņš+A:ieskāņ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
iesāļš+A:iesāļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
ietumšs+A:ietumš A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
iezaļš+A:iezaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
induktīvs+A:induktīv A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
izdarīgs+A:izdarīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
jaunapgūts+A:jaunapgūt A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
jebkurš+A:jebkur A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
jūraszaļš+A:jūraszaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
kaitniecisks+A:kaitniecisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
karotināls+A:karotināl A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
kiviveidīgs+A:kiviveidīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
klajš+A:klaj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
klusiņš+A:klusiņ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
koloidāls+A:koloidāl A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
konspiratīvs+A:konspiratīv A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
kosmētisks+A:kosmētisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
košzaļš+A:košzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
kraujš+A:krauj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
krokains+A:krokain A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
kulīgs+A:kulīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
kārtējs+A:kārtēj A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
laringāls+A:laringāl A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
lielmutīgs+A:lielmutīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
lizamīnzaļš+A:lizamīnzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
logaritmisks+A:logaritmisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
līdzparakstīts+A:līdzparakstīt A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
malahītzaļš+A:malahītzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
maleēts+A:maleēt A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
mazietilpīgs+A:mazietilpīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
maziņš+A:maziņ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
mazītiņš+A:mazītiņ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
meistarisks+A:meistarisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
melnzaļš+A:melnzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
metilēnzils+A:metilēnzil A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
mikroklimatisks+A:mikroklimatisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
momentāns+A:momentān A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
musturots+A:musturot A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
mēļš+A:mēļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
mīļš+A:mīļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
mūžamzaļš+A:mūžamzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
mūžzaļš+A:mūžzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
nabags+A:nabag A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
naujš+A:nauj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
neapskaužams+A:neapskaužam A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
nedrošs+A:nedroš A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
nedziļš+A:nedziļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
negarš+A:negar A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
neizlēmīgs+A:neizlēmīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
neleģislatīvs+A:neleģislatīv A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
neoimpresionistisks+A:neoimpresionistisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
neprecīzs+A:neprecīz A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
nesenējs+A:nesenēj A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
nevienlīdzīgs+A:nevienlīdzīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
nomaļš+A:nomaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
nomācējs+A:nomācēj A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
oficiozs+A:oficioz A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
olīvzaļš+A:olīvzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
organofilisks+A:organofilisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
paciešs+A:pacieš A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
padobjš+A:padobj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
padumjš+A:padumj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
padumjš+A:padumj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
padziļš+A:padziļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
pagarš+A:pagar A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
paglupjš+A:paglupj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
pakautrīgs+A:pakautrīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
paklajš+A:paklaj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
pamazītējs+A:pamazītēj A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
parasts+A:parast A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
paraupjš+A:paraupj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
parupjš+A:parupj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
paskaļš+A:paskaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
paskumjš+A:paskumj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
paslapjš+A:paslapj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
paslikts+A:paslikt A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
pastraujš+A:pastrauj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
pasājš+A:pasāj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
pasāļš+A:pasāļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
patroloģisks+A:patroloģisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
pavājš+A:pavāj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
pazaļš+A:pazaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
pašauglīgs+A:pašauglīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
pašsterils+A:pašsteril A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
pelēkzaļgans+A:pelēkzaļgan A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
pelēkzaļš+A:pelēkzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
piecreizējs+A:piecreizēj A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
pikts+A:pikt A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
pirātisks+A:pirātisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
plikgalvīgs+A:plikgalvīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
polihroms+A:polihrom A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
preciozs+A:precioz A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
priekšroksecīgs+A:priekšroksecīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
prosveidīgs+A:prosveidīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
punktuāls+A:punktuāl A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
pusapaļš+A:pusapaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
pusdziļš+A:pusdziļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
pusgarš+A:pusgar A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
pusmehānisks+A:pusmehānisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
pusrupjš+A:pusrupj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
pusskaļš+A:pusskaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
puszaļš+A:puszaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
putekļveidīgs+A:putekļveidīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
pārgarš+A:pārgar A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
pārsteidzošs+A:pārsteidzoš A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
radioelektronisks+A:radioelektronisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
raupjš+A:raupj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
raustīgs+A:raustīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
rekursīvs+A:rekursīv A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
rezistīvs+A:rezistīv A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
rožains+A:rožain A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
rupjš+A:rupj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
rūpestīgs+A:rūpestīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
rūsganzaļš+A:rūsganzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
saldsājš+A:saldsāj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
salnains+A:salnain A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
salātzaļš+A:salātzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
sarkanzaļš+A:sarkanzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
sarveidīgs+A:sarveidīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
savmaļš+A:savmaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
sekundārs+A:sekundār A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
sešreizējs+A:sešreizēj A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
simpātisks+A:simpātisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
sirdsmīļš+A:sirdsmīļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
sirmzaļš+A:sirmzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
skandināvistisks+A:skandināvistisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
skaļš+A:skaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
skaņš+A:skaņ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
skrajš+A:skraj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
skumjš+A:skumj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
skāņš+A:skāņ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
slapjš+A:slapj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
slavējams+A:slavējam A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
smaragdzaļš+A:smaragdzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
smieklīgs+A:smieklīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
spastisks+A:spastisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
spraišļots+A:spraišļot A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
spējš+A:spēj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
starpkontinentāls+A:starpkontinentāl A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
stratigrāfisks+A:stratigrāfisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
straujš+A:strauj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
sudrabzaļš+A:sudrabzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
supergarš+A:supergar A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
superprecīzs+A:superprecīz A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
sājš+A:sāj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
sāļš+A:sāļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
sīkpuķains+A:sīkpuķain A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
sūnzaļš+A:sūnzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
teoloģisks+A:teoloģisk A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
trakulīgs+A:trakulīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
tumsnīgs+A:tumsnīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
tumšzaļš+A:tumšzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
tāļš+A:tāļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
unikāls+A:unikāl A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
vasarzaļš+A:vasarzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
vaļējs+A:vaļēj A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
vienmuļš+A:vienmuļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
vientuļš+A:vientuļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
vienveidīgs+A:vienveidīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
vājš+A:vāj A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
vāvulīgs+A:vāvulīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
zaļš+A:zaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
ziemzaļš+A:ziemzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
zilgansudrabains+A:zilgansudrabain A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
zilganzaļš+A:zilganzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
zilizaļš+A:zilizaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
zilzaļš+A:zilzaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
zvīļš+A:zvīļ A_14ZAĻŠ_  "" ;
četrpadsmitgadīgs+A:četrpadsmitgadīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
ļaunīgs+A:ļaunīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
šņākulīgs+A:šņākulīg A_13JAUNS_  "" ;
